Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Article 1. Major Political Parties

§ 22-4-101.
Application; composition, election and qualifications of county central committees; certificate of election.

This article is applicable only to “major political parties”.

The county central committee of each political party consists of precinct committeemen and committeewomen elected in the county at the regular biennial primary election. Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, each political party in each precinct shall elect one (1) committeeman and one (1) committeewoman for each two hundred fifty (250) votes or major fraction thereof cast for the party’s candidate for representative in congress in the last general election, but provided that no precinct shall be entitled to less than one (1) precinct committeeman and precinct committeewoman. Precinct committeemen and committeewomen shall be electors registered in the party and resident in the precinct. If a precinct boundary line is changed for any reason, the county commissioners shall determine the number of precinct committeemen and committeewomen to which the affected precinct is entitled.

In any general election year in which a new plan of legislative districts is required, the number of precinct committeemen and committeewomen shall be one (1) committeeman and one (1) committeewoman for each two hundred fifty (250) votes or major fraction thereof of voters registered in that political party at the time election districts are adopted by the county commissioners as provided in W.S.

22-7-101

, provided that no precinct shall be entitled to less than one (1) precinct committeeman and precinct committeewoman.

No later than forty-five (45) days after the date of the primary election, the county canvassing board or a canvassing board appointed by the county clerk consisting of two (2) electors and the county clerk, shall provide to each county chairman the certified election results for precinct committeemen and committeewomen and a list of persons who received write-in votes for precinct committeemen or committeewomen.

The term of office for all precinct committeemen and committeewomen shall be two (2) years and shall begin on the first Monday in January of the year following their election.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-34; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 1996, ch. 93, § 1; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2012, ch. 9, § 1; 2015 ch. 154, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2020 ch. 92, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2012 amendment,

inserted “Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section” in (b); and adding (c).

Laws 2012, ch. 9 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 6, 2012.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (b), deleted the former next-to-last sentence, which read: “The county clerk shall issue a certificate of election to the precinct committeemen and committeewomen elected and concurrently notify the county central committee chairman. The certificate shall state the term of office which shall begin on the day the primary election is canvassed and shall expire on the date the next regular biennial primary election is canvassed”; and added (d) and (e).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a) deleted “Except for the term beginning after the canvass of the 2014 primary election” at the beginning and the last sentence, which read “The term for committeemen and committeewomen elected at the 2014 primary election shall end on the first Monday in January of 2017.”

§ 22-4-102.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1, related to the procedure for breaking a tie vote for precinct committeeman or committeewoman.

§ 22-4-103.
County central committee vacancies.

A vacancy in the county central committee shall occur in the case of death, resignation, failure of a qualified candidate to be elected to a precinct committeeman or committeewoman position, or removal of residence from the precinct. A vacancy shall be filled by the county central committee by election of a registered elector resident in the precinct in which the vacancy exists and registered in the party or as provided by the party bylaws.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-36; 1998, ch. 100, § 2.

§ 22-4-104.
County central committee organizational meeting; notice of meetings.

The county central committee shall meet and organize under the direction of the county chairman at the time and place determined by the county chairman within thirty (30) days after the term of its members begins. The county chairman shall also publish a notice of all meetings of the county central committee in a newspaper of general county circulation not less than two (2) days prior to a meeting.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-37; 1996, ch. 93, § 1; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2015 ch. 154, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2020 ch. 92, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in the first sentence, substituted “received the certified election results of all members elected to the committee” for “received notice from the county clerk that all of its members have been certified elected.”

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, substituted “after the term of its members begins” for “after the county chairman has received the certified election results of all members elected to the committee.”

§ 22-4-105.
County central committee odd year meeting; notice; election of chairman, state committeeman and committeewoman.

The county central committee shall meet at the county seat each odd-numbered year at a time and place determined by the county chairman. The county chairman shall publish notice of the meeting in a newspaper of general circulation within the county not less than ten (10) days before this meeting. At the meeting, the county central committee shall elect the chairman of the county central committee, one (1) state committeeman and one (1) state committeewoman and other offices as provided by the party bylaws. A state political party may provide in its rules for the election of additional state committeemen and additional state committeewomen. Neither the chairman, state committeeman or state committeewoman need be members of the county central committee.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-38; Laws 1983, ch. 183, § 2; 1996, ch. 93, § 1; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 47, § 1.

§ 22-4-106.
County convention.

The county convention of each political party shall meet in even-numbered years.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-39; Laws 1983, ch. 183, § 2; 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 1996, ch. 93, § 1; 1999, ch. 202, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 47, § 1.

§ 22-4-107.
County convention delegates.

Delegates to the county convention of a political party are the members of the county central committee, unless a political party provides in its rules for an alternate method of selecting such delegates.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-40.

§ 22-4-108.
Delegates and alternates to state convention; county platform.

The county convention shall elect from electors resident in the county and registered in the party delegates and alternates to the state convention as apportioned by the rules of the party. The county convention may also adopt a county platform.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-41.

§ 22-4-109.
Notice to state chairman of state committeeman and committeewoman.

The county chairman shall immediately notify the state chairman in writing of the names and addresses of persons elected to the offices of state committeeman and committeewoman.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-42.

§ 22-4-110.
Composition of state central committee.

The state central committee consists of state committeemen and committeewomen and county chairmen elected at the odd-numbered year meeting of the county central committees, and of any other party officials provided by the bylaws of the party.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-43; Laws 1983, ch. 183, § 2; 1996, ch. 93, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 47, § 1.

§ 22-4-111.
State central committee organizational meeting; notice.

The state central committee shall hold an organizational meeting in odd-numbered years, at which it shall elect from electors registered in the party a chairman, secretary and other officers as provided in the rules of the party. The state chairman shall mail notice of the time and place of this meeting to each member of the committee not later than ten (10) days before the meeting.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-44; Laws 1983, ch. 183, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 47, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to computing periods of time, see §

22-2-110

.

§ 22-4-112.
State committeeman or committeewoman vacancies.

A vacancy in the office of state committeeman or committeewoman occurring by death, resignation or removal of residence from the county shall be filled by the county central committee of the county in which the vacancy occurs within thirty (30) days of such vacancy.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-45.

Cross references. —

As to computing periods of time, see §

22-2-110

.

§ 22-4-113.
Delegation of functions to subcommittees.

The state and county central committees may delegate any lawful function to a subcommittee by majority resolution consistent with party rules, except election of its officers.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-46.

§ 22-4-114.
Representation by proxy; qualifications.

A member of a political committee or subcommittee may be represented at any meeting of the committee or subcommittee by written proxy. A person holding a proxy must be a resident of the same political subdivision as the member he represents. No person shall be allowed to vote more than two (2) proxies.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-47.

§ 22-4-115.
Date of party state convention.

Each political party shall hold a state convention in even-numbered years.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-48; Laws 1983, ch. 183, § 2; 1996, ch. 93, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 47, § 1.

§ 22-4-116.
Calling of state convention; contents of notice.

The state chairman shall call a state convention by filing notice in the office of the secretary of state and of each county clerk not later than twenty (20) days before the convention. The notice shall state the total number of delegates and alternates, and the number of delegates to which each county is entitled.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-49.

Cross references. —

As to computing periods of time, see §

22-2-110

.

§ 22-4-117.
State convention members.

Members of the state convention are the delegates or their alternates chosen by the county conventions, and the delegates or their alternates chosen at large by the youth organizations of the political parties in accordance with rules of their respective party.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-50; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2.

§ 22-4-118.
State convention powers and duties.

The state convention has the following powers and duties:

To nominate electors of president and vice-president of the United States;

To elect national committeemen and committeewomen;

To adopt a platform;

To select delegates and alternates to national nominating conventions;

To formulate or change the rules governing the internal organizations of the party which rules must include:

The time, place, manner of election and terms of office of party officers not provided by statute;

The method of apportioning delegates and alternates to the state convention to each county;

The method of selecting delegates and alternates to the national convention;

The name, powers and duties of any standing committee of the state central committee and the state convention;

Rules of conduct for county and state conventions;

Powers and duties delegated to county and state committees.

To conduct such other business as it deems necessary or proper.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-51.

Cross references. —

As to election of presidential and vice-presidential electors, see §§

22-19-101

to

22-19-109

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Power to make party nominations. —

Legislature has never recognized any power in political committees to make party nominations, except as delegated to it either by party convention or legislature. State ex rel. Copenhaver v. Jack, 60 Wyo. 405, 153 P.2d 149,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1944).

Statutes did not authorize state central committee to nominate candidate for office of secretary of state to fill unexpired term of one who died 26 days before general election date. State ex rel. Copenhaver v. Jack, 60 Wyo. 405, 153 P.2d 149,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1944).

§ 22-4-119.
Certification and filing of rules and bylaws.

The county party chairman and party secretary shall certify all rules and bylaws promulgated, revoked or amended by the county central committee and file them with the county clerk within thirty (30) days after the adjournment of the county central committee meeting.

The state party chairman and party secretary shall certify all rules and bylaws promulgated, revoked or amended by the state convention and file them with the secretary of state within thirty (30) days after the adjournment of the state convention.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-52; 1998, ch. 100, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to computing periods of time, see §

22-2-110

.

§ 22-4-120.
Certification of presidential elector nominees and party officers.

The state party chairman and party secretary shall certify the names of nominees for presidential electors and the names of the state and county party officers elected or appointed to the secretary of state immediately after their selection.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-53; 1996, ch. 93, § 1; 1998, ch. 100, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to election of presidential and vice-presidential electors, see §§

22-19-101

to

22-19-109

.